Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2011
George Amos, Jr.; sympathy; financial assistance.

The Legislature, while recognizing that nothing it might do can compensate them for their loss, nevertheless wishes to extend its sympathy and financial assistance to the family of slain Trooper George Amos, Jr., such family consisting of Mrs. Dolores Ann Amos, widow, and Michael B. Amos and James M. Amos, sons.

Laws 1973, LB 585, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-440.01.